Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-171
Inclusion of lands; guardians, executors, and administrators; when authorized to sign petitions.

A guardian, executor or an administrator of an estate, who is appointed as such under the laws of this state, and who, as such guardian, executor or administrator, is entitled to the possession of the lands belonging to the estate which he represents, may, on behalf of his ward or the estate which he represents, upon being thereunto authorized by the proper court, sign and acknowledge the petition mentioned in section 46-161, and may show cause, as mentioned in section 46-166 why the boundaries of the district should not be changed.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 44, p. 295;

R.S.1913, § 3502;

C.S.1922, § 2902;

C.S.1929, § 46-147;

R.S.1943, § 46-171.